Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4410
Prohibited acts.

A risk retention group shall not:

(1) Solicit or sell insurance to any person who is not eligible for membership in such group; or

(2) Solicit or sell insurance or operate in a hazardous financial condition or financially impaired condition.

Laws 1987, LB 514, § 10.